Hawaii statutes.
§143-2 License required. It shall be
unlawful for any person to own or harbor a dog unless the dog is licensed as
provided by this chapter, provided that the legislative bodies of the several
counties may, by ordinance, dispense with or modify the licensing requirements
of this chapter. This chapter shall not apply to dogs under the age of three
months which do not run at large, dogs in quarantine and dogs brought into the
State exclusively for the purpose of entering them in a dog show or dog exhibition
and not allowed to run at large. [L 1941, c 268, §2; RL 1945, §7152; RL 1955,
§156-2; HRS §143-2; am L 1973, c 146, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next